District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.10

Regulations.

The Commissioner may promulgate regulations deemed necessary by the Commissioner for the administration of this subchapter.

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125j
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-273, § 2, 46 DCR 1132

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3825.10.